Vermont, session 2025-2026, H722.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 2291 is amended to read:
§ 2291. ENUMERATION OF POWERS
For the purpose of promoting the public health, safety, welfare, and
convenience, a town, city, or incorporated village shall have the following
powers:
* * *
VT LEG #385511 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.722
2026 Page 2 of 2
(31) To regulate the surface water use of a public water used as a public
water source, regardless of where the public water is located, when the public
water is used by a public water system of the municipality and the municipality
owns all of the land adjoining the public water. Any ordinance adopted under
this section shall be in addition to any rules adopted by the Secretary of
Natural Resources pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 1424, provided that, in the event of
a conflict between a municipal ordinance adopted under this section and a rule
adopted by the Secretary of Natural Resources, the municipal ordinance shall
control. In this subdivision:
(A) “Public water” has the same meaning as in 10 V.S.A. § 1422,
except that under this subdivision (31), “public water” does not mean
transboundary lakes or ponds.
(B) “Public water source” and “public water system” have the same
meanings as in 10 V.S.A. § 1671.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385511 v.1